Tennessee statutes. Title 21 Proceedings In Chancery
Part 6

Answers

21-1-601. Oath to answer.

When an answer is required to be sworn to, the oath may be administered as in case of the bill of complainant. The power of the court or clerk and master to appoint a special commissioner to administer the oath, either in this or any other state, is not affected by this section.

Code 1858, §§ 4398, 4399 (deriv. Acts 1801, ch. 6, § 11); Shan., §§ 6208, 6209; mod. Code 1932, §§ 10478, 10479; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 21-614.

Cross-References. Oath to bill, § 21-1-102.

Signing of pleadings, Tenn. R. Civ. P. 11.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 3 Tenn. Juris., Attachment and Garnishment, § 77.

21-1-602. Evidential value of answer in discovery and where oath not waived.

A sworn answer in chancery, when required by a bill of discovery or when the oath to the answer is not waived, shall have no more weight or effect in evidence than the deposition of the defendant filing the answer.

Acts 1957, ch. 153, § 1; T.C.A., § 21-628.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 11 Tenn. Juris., Equity, § 50.